Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201652-2102
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the
Commercial Real Estate Broker Lien Act:

(1) Commercial
real estate means any real estate other than real estate containing no more
than four residential units or real estate on which no buildings or structures
are located and that is zoned for single-family residential use. Commercial
real estate does not include single-family residential units such as condominiums,
townhouses, or homes in a subdivision when sold, leased, or otherwise conveyed
on a unit-by-unit basis, even though these units may be a part of a larger
building or parcel of real estate containing more than four residential units;

(2) Commission
means any and all compensation that may be due a commercial real estate broker
for performance of licensed services; and

(3) Commission agreement means a written
agreement with a designated commercial real estate broker as required by subsections
(2) through (6) of section 76-2422.

Laws 2013, LB3, § 8.